Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 68. Nursing.

Cross references. —

For duty of nurses to report certain injuries, see AS

08.64.369

.

For provisions relating to needle stick and sharps injury protections, see AS

18.60.880

—

18.60.890

.

Administrative Code. —

For board of nursing, see 12 AAC 44.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which amended provisions in this chapter relating to opioid prescription and education on pain management and opioid use and addiction, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, § 7.

State regulation of midwifery, 59 ALR4th 929.